Hawaii statutes.
§431:2-307.5 Reimbursement and compensation
of examiners; source of funds; disposition of receipts. (a) All moneys
necessary for the compensation and reimbursement of independent contractor
examiners and insurance division staff examiners for actual travel expenses,
reasonable living expenses, and per diem expenses, at customary rates approved
by the commissioner shall be allocated by the legislature through
appropriations out of the state compliance resolution fund. The department
shall include in its budgetary request for each upcoming fiscal period, the
amounts necessary to effectuate the purposes of this section.

(b) All moneys, fees, and other payments
received by the commissioner under this part shall be deposited to the credit
of the state compliance resolution fund. [L 1995, c 61, §1 as superseded by c
232, §1; am L 1999, c 163, §15(1); am L 2002, c 39, §9]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next